Illinois, session 104th, SB1474.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $12,000,000 or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Illinois Arts Council for grants to public radio 7and television stations and related administrative expenses 8pursuant to the Public Radio and Television Grant Act. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102025.